Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 4 Involuntary Outpatient Care

37-3-90.
Physician’s or psychologist’s determination and certification as to necessity of involuntary care; treatment of patient as inpatient or outpatient; minors.

When a physician or psychologist at a facility or on behalf of a facility determines and certifies under this article that there is reason to believe a patient admitted to or examined at the facility is a mentally ill person requiring involuntary treatment,
that physician or psychologist shall further determine and certify whether there is reason to believe the patient is:

An inpatient or outpatient; and

If an outpatient, whether there is available outpatient treatment.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the determination and certification as to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be made within the time period required for determining whether a patient is a mentally ill person requiring
involuntary treatment, except that if such determination is made by a physician or psychologist at or on behalf of a community mental health center, the determination and certification shall be made within four hours after the
patient is examined by the physician or psychologist.

A person determined and certified to be:

An outpatient; and

A person for whom there is available outpatient treatment

shall be considered to be in need of involuntary outpatient treatment and not involuntary inpatient treatment for purposes of further proceedings under this article until such time as that person’s status is determined to be otherwise pursuant to those
proceedings.

A person determined and certified to be a mentally ill person requiring involuntary treatment who does not meet all of the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall be considered to be in need of involuntary inpatient
treatment and not involuntary outpatient treatment for purposes of further proceedings under this article until such time as that person’s status is determined to be otherwise pursuant to those proceedings.

Any minor admitted voluntarily shall be released at any time after written request is made by the minor’s parent or legal guardian.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 8; Ga. L. 1995, p. 612, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment, “1986 Amendments to Georgia’s Mental Health Statutes: The Latest Attempt to Provide a Solution to the Problem of the Chronically Mentally Ill,” see 36 Emory L.J. 1313 (1987).

For note on the 1995 amendment of this Code section, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 258 (1995).

37-3-91.
Discharge of persons meeting outpatient care criteria.

A person who is in the physical custody of a community mental health center, emergency receiving facility, or evaluating facility and who is determined by a physician or a psychologist, at or on behalf of that facility, to meet all of the outpatient treatment
requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 37-3-90 shall be discharged from that facility as provided in this Code section pending a full and fair hearing or waiver thereof under Code Section 37-3-92.
That discharge from a community mental health center shall occur within four hours after the patient is examined by a physician or a psychologist at or on behalf of that center. That discharge from an emergency receiving facility
shall occur within 48 hours after the patient’s admission thereto. That discharge from an evaluating facility shall occur no later than the expiration of the five-day evaluation period established under Code Section 37-3-64.

Prior to a psychologist’s discharging the patient under subsection (a) of this Code section, the treating psychologist shall obtain the concurrence of a physician. In addition, within the time period the facility is authorized to retain the patient,
the facility at which or on behalf of which the patient was examined, which facility shall be the “referring facility” for purposes of this part, shall prepare an individualized service plan for the patient. This plan shall be
prepared in consultation with the facility at which available outpatient treatment is to be provided the patient, which facility shall be the “receiving facility” for purposes of this part. The referring facility shall also make
arrangements with the receiving facility to provide interim outpatient treatment, in accordance with the individualized service plan, to the patient pending the full and fair hearing or waiver thereof. Nothing in this Code section
shall prevent a referring facility for a patient from also being the receiving facility for that patient.

A patient for whom interim outpatient treatment is arranged pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall obtain that treatment or be subject to the provisions of Code Section 37-3-82. Written notice of the time, date, place, and address for that
interim outpatient treatment shall be provided the patient prior to the patient’s discharge, along with written notification that if the patient does not comply with the interim outpatient treatment or attend or waive a hearing,
the time and date of which hearing will later be provided the patient, the patient may be involuntarily admitted for examination, treatment, or both. Notice of the discharge shall be provided to persons other than the patient in
the same manner and under the same conditions as required by subsection (c) of Code Section 37-3-43 and subsection (d) of Code Section 37-3-64, and that notice shall also include a notice regarding the interim outpatient treatment
and the consequences if the patient does not obtain the treatment or attend or waive the hearing.

Within three days after a referring facility has discharged a patient pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, that facility shall transmit to the receiving facility a copy of the referring facility’s examination report, individualized service
plan, and such other necessary clinical information the referring facility may have regarding the patient. Within five days after receiving such report, plan, and information, the receiving facility shall petition the court of
the county in which the patient is located for a full and fair hearing pursuant to Code Section 37-3-92 and include with the petition a copy of the examination report, the individualized service plan, and the address to which the
patient was discharged by the referring facility.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, a patient detained in a treatment facility pursuant to a certificate and petition under Code Section 37-3-81, whether or not that patient is subsequently determined by that facility
during the time of such detention to meet all of the outpatient treatment requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 37-3-90, may not be discharged from that facility until a full and fair hearing
is held pursuant to Code Section 37-3-81.1, which hearing may not be waived by any patient so determined to meet all of such outpatient treatment requirements.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 797, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 9; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 37.

37-3-92.
Hearing; notice; waiver of hearing; apprehension and detention of patient failing to appear; treatment upon waiver.

Except when a hearing is waived as provided in this subsection, within 30 days after the filing of the petition under subsection (d) of Code Section 37-3-91, the court shall hold a full and fair hearing. At least ten days prior to that hearing, the court
shall have served on the patient and the patient’s representatives the same notices and information required by paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of Code Section 37-3-81, as well as a notice that the patient may waive
in writing the hearing but if the patient does not either attend or waive the hearing the court may order the patient to be taken into custody, hospitalized, evaluated, and treated. The patient and representatives shall have the
rights specified in those notices. Hearings held pursuant to this subsection shall be held as provided in Code Section 37-3-81.1, and the court holding the hearing may issue any order authorized by and subject to the limitations
of that Code Section 37-3-81.1.

If the patient is notified of the hearing as required under subsection (a) of this Code section and does not appear at or waive that hearing, absent a showing of good cause for not appearing, the court may issue an order commanding any peace officer to
take such person into custody and deliver that person to an emergency receiving facility or the referring facility if there is a physician or psychologist available there, and this chapter shall thereafter apply to that patient
as though the patient had been admitted to that facility pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 37-3-41.

If the hearing is waived as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, that hearing shall not be held but the court shall order the patient to obtain available outpatient treatment under the individualized service plan submitted with the petition
for hearing.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 10.

37-3-93.
Court order for outpatient treatment; physician’s or psychologist’s petition to extend order; review of petition; hearing on extension petition; patients under juvenile court jurisdiction.

Pursuant to Code Section 37-3-81.1 or Code Section 37-3-92, the court may order the patient to obtain available outpatient treatment for any period not to exceed one year, but the total period of involuntary treatment required by such order, including
inpatient treatment within the limitations of Code Section 37-3-81.1, shall not exceed one year.

If it is necessary to continue available outpatient treatment beyond the period authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, at least 60 days prior to the expiration of that period the physician or psychologist responsible for that treatment
or the person responsible for the patient’s treatment under the direction and with approval of the physician or psychologist shall:

Update the patient’s individualized service plan;

Prepare a report containing evidence that the patient meets all the requirements for available outpatient treatment under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 37-3-90; and

Petition the hearing examiners appointed to hold hearings under Code Section 37-3-83 for an order requiring the patient to obtain available outpatient treatment beyond the period previously ordered for the patient.

The petition shall contain a plain and simple statement that the patient or the patient’s representatives may file a request for a hearing with a hearing examiner appointed to hold hearings pursuant to Code Section 37-3-83 within 15 days after service
of the petition, that the patient has a right to counsel at the hearing, that the patient or the patient’s representatives may apply immediately to the court to have counsel appointed if the patient cannot afford counsel,
and that the court will appoint counsel for the patient unless the patient indicates in writing that the patient does not desire to be represented by counsel or has made the patient’s own arrangements for counsel.

If a hearing is not requested by the patient or the representatives within 15 days of service of the petition on the patient and the patient’s representatives, the hearing examiner shall make an independent review of the report, the updated individualized
service plan, and the petition. If the hearing examiner concludes from that review that the patient is no longer a mentally ill person requiring involuntary treatment, then that hearing examiner shall order that a hearing be held
pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section. If the hearing examiner concludes that the patient meets all the requirements for available outpatient treatment under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 37-3-90,
then the hearing examiner shall order continued outpatient treatment for a period not to exceed one year.

If the hearing examiner orders a hearing pursuant to subsection (c) or (e) of this Code section or if a hearing is requested within 15 days of service of the petition on the patient and the patient’s representatives, the hearing examiner shall set a time
and place for the hearing to be held within 25 days of the time the hearing examiner receives the request but in any event no later than the day on which the current order of involuntary outpatient treatment expires. Notice of
the hearing shall be served on the patient, the patient’s representatives, the facility providing outpatient treatment for the patient, and, when appropriate, on counsel for the patient. The hearing examiner, within that person’s
discretion, may grant a change of venue for the convenience of parties or witnesses. Such hearing shall be a full and fair hearing. After such hearing, the hearing examiner may issue any order which the court is authorized to issue
under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 37-3-81.1 and subject to the limitations of that Code section. If the patient does not appear at the hearing, absent a showing of good cause, the hearing examiner
may issue any order the court is authorized to issue under subsection (b) of Code Section 37-3-92.

The hearing examiner for a patient who is ordered to obtain available outpatient treatment, who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, and who reaches the age of 17 without having had a full and fair hearing pursuant to any provisions of this
article or without having waived such hearing shall order that a hearing be held pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-93

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 18; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 11; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 37.

Law reviews.

For comment, “1986 Amendments to Georgia’s Mental Health Statutes: The Latest Attempt to Provide a Solution to the Problem of the Chronically Mentally Ill,” see 36 Emory L.J. 1313 (1987).

37-3-94.
Reviews of individual service plans; discharge of patients from treatment; notice of discharge.

Each individualized service plan for available outpatient treatment shall be reviewed at regular intervals to determine the patient’s progress toward the stated goals and objectives of the plan and to determine whether the plan should be modified because
of the patient’s present condition. These reviews should be based upon relevant progress notes in the patient’s clinical record and upon other related information; and input from the patient should be obtained and utilized where
feasible.

Any time a patient is found by the physician or psychologist in charge of the patient’s outpatient treatment no longer to be a mentally ill person requiring involuntary treatment, that physician or psychologist shall discharge the patient from further
compliance with the treatment.

Notice of the discharge under subsection (b) of this Code section shall be given to the patient and his representatives; to the court which originally ordered such involuntary treatment; and, if the patient was under criminal charges of which the facility
received written notification, by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the law enforcement agency originally having custody of the patient.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-94

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 19; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

37-3-95.
Discharge of patients under criminal charges.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of any part of this article, a patient under criminal charges, notice of which has been given in writing to the facility, may only be discharged from the physical custody of a facility if the facility, by certified
mail or statutory overnight delivery, provides written notification of the proposed discharge to the law enforcement agency originally having custody of the patient and the patient is discharged into the physical custody of a peace
officer from that agency. That agency shall be required to assume such physical custody within five days after receipt in writing of the notification of proposed discharge.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 5; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.